Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 9. Directors and Officers.
§ 13.1-691.
Director conflict of interests.

A conflict of interests transaction is a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has an interest that precludes the director from being a disinterested director. A conflict of interests transaction is not voidable by the corporation solely because of the director’s interest in the transaction if any one of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors and the board of directors or committee authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction;

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed to the shareholders entitled to vote and they authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction; or

The transaction was fair to the corporation.

For purposes of subdivision A 1, a conflict of interests transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors on the board of directors, or on the committee. A transaction shall not be authorized, approved, or ratified under this section by a single director. If a majority of the disinterested directors vote to authorize, approve or ratify the transaction, a quorum is present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director who is not disinterested does not affect the validity of any action taken under subdivision A 1 if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved or ratified as provided in that subsection.

For purposes of subdivision A 2, a conflict of interests transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the vote of a majority of the shares entitled to be counted under this subsection. Shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who is not disinterested may not be counted in a vote of shareholders to determine whether to authorize, approve, or ratify a conflict of interests transaction under subdivision A 2. The vote of those shares, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this chapter. A majority of the shares, whether or not present, that are entitled to be counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-39.1; 1975, c. 500; 1980, c. 341; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765.

Cross references.

As to trustee standard of conduct, trustee liability and restrictions on liability limitations in governing instruments under the Virginia Business Trust Act, see §

13.1-1229

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “has an interest that precludes the director from being a disinterested director” for “has a direct or indirect personal interest” in the first sentence in subsection A; deleted former subsection B, relating to directors with an indirect personal interest in transactions; and rewrote former subsections C and D and redesignated them as present subsections B and C.

§ 13.1-691.1.
Business opportunities.

A director’s taking advantage, directly or indirectly, of a business opportunity may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against the director, in a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation on the ground that such opportunity should have first been offered to the corporation, if before becoming legally obligated respecting the opportunity the director brings it to the attention of the corporation and:

Directors’ action disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-691

, as if the decision being made concerned a director’s conflict of interests transaction; or

Shareholders’ action disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in subdivision A 2 of §

13.1-691

, as if the decision being made concerned a director’s conflict of interests transaction.

In any proceeding seeking equitable relief or other remedies, based upon an alleged improper taking advantage of a business opportunity by a director, the fact that the director did not employ one of the procedures described in subsection A before taking advantage of the opportunity shall not create an inference that the opportunity should have been first presented to the corporation or alter the burden of proof otherwise applicable to establish that the director breached a duty to the corporation in the circumstances.

History.

2005, c. 765.

§ 13.1-692.
Liability for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution in excess of what may be authorized and made pursuant to this chapter or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to the corporation and its creditors for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating this chapter or the articles of incorporation if the party asserting liability establishes that when taking the action the director did not comply with §

13.1-690

.

A director held liable for an unlawful distribution under subsection A is entitled to:

Contribution from every other director who could be held liable under subsection A for the unlawful distribution; and

Recoupment from the shareholders who received the unlawful distribution in proportion to the amounts of such unlawful distribution received by them respectively.

No suit shall be brought against any director for any liability imposed by subsection A except within two years after the right of action shall accrue.

Contribution or recoupment under subsection B is barred unless it is commenced within one year after the liability of the claimant has been finally adjudicated under subsection A.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-206, 13-207, 13.1-44; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, deleted the beginning which read: “Unless he complies with the applicable standards of conduct described in § 13.1 690” and added “if the party asserting liability establishes that when taking the action the director did not comply with §

13.1-690

” to the end; in subsection B, deleted “of this section” preceding “is entitled to” and deleted “contribution” following “is entitled to”; rewrote subdivision B 1; added “Recoupment” to the beginning of subdivision B 2; substituted “subsection A” for “this section” in subsection C; and added subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “in excess of what may be authorized and made pursuant to” for “made in violation of.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 110.

§ 13.1-692.1.
Limitation on liability of officers and directors; exception.

In any proceeding brought by or in the right of a corporation or brought by or on behalf of shareholders of the corporation, the damages assessed against an officer or director arising out of a single transaction, occurrence or course of conduct shall not exceed the lesser of:

The monetary amount, including the elimination of liability, specified in the articles of incorporation or, if approved by the shareholders, in the bylaws as a limitation on or elimination of the liability of the officer or director; or

The greater of (i) $100,000 or (ii) the amount of cash compensation received by the officer or director from the corporation during the 12 months immediately preceding the act or omission for which liability was imposed.

The liability of an officer or director shall not be limited as provided in this section if the officer or director engaged in willful misconduct or a knowing violation of the criminal law or of any federal or state securities law, including, without limitation, any claim of unlawful insider trading or manipulation of the market for any security.

No limitation or elimination of liability adopted pursuant to this section may be affected by any amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws with respect to any action or omission occurring before such amendment.

History.

1987, cc. 59, 257; 1988, c. 561; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 deleted former subsection C, which read: “No limitation on or elimination of liability adopted pursuant to this section may be affected by any amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws with respect to any act or omission occurring before such amendment”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection C.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey of business and corporate law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 627 (1991).

For an article, “Misunderstanding Director Duties: The Strange Case of Virginia,” see 56 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1127 (1999).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 41 (2011).

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 8 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

For comment, “Private Ordering in the Old Dominion: A Solution to Frivolous Litigation or the Elimination of a Fundamental Shareholder Right?” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 297 (2018).

§ 13.1-693.
Required officers.

Except as provided in an agreement authorized by §

13.1-671.1

, a corporation shall have such officers with such titles and duties as shall be described in the bylaws or in a resolution of the board of directors that is in accordance with the bylaws and as may be necessary to enable it to execute documents that comply with subsection F of §

13.1-604

.

Officers shall be elected by the board of directors, except that an officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The secretary of the corporation shall have the responsibility for preparing the minutes of the directors’ and shareholders’ meetings and for maintaining and authenticating the records of the corporation required to be kept under subsection E of §

13.1-770

.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation.

Election or appointment of an officer does not of itself create any contract rights in the officer or the corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-45; 1956, c. 428; 1972, c. 606; 1975, c. 500; 1982, c. 372; 1985, c. 522; 1994, c. 189; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 added “Except as provided in an agreement authorized by §

13.1-671.1

” to the beginning of subsection A; and substituted “The board of directors may elect individuals to fill one or more offices of the corporation. An officer” for “A duly appointed officer” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 55, 149.

§ 13.1-694.
Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

In discharging his duties, an officer who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to rely on:

The performance of properly delegated responsibilities by one or more employees of the corporation whom the officer believes in good faith to be reliable and competent in performing the responsibilities delegated; or

Information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by one or more employees of the corporation whom the officer believes in good faith to be reliable and competent in the matters presented or by legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the officer believes in good faith are matters (i) within the particular person’s professional or expert competence or (ii) as to which the particular person merits confidence.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-45; 1956, c. 428; 1972, c. 606; 1975, c. 500; 1982, c. 372; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 13.1-695.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering a written notice to the board of directors, its chairman, the appointing officer, if any, or the corporation’s secretary. A resignation is effective as provided in subdivision A 9 of §

13.1-610

unless the notice provides for a delayed effectiveness. If effectiveness of a resignation is stated to be delayed and the board of directors or the appointing officer, if any, accepts the delay, the board of directors or the appointing officer, if any, may fill the pending vacancy before the delayed effectiveness but the new officer may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

An officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by (i) the board of directors; (ii) the appointing officer, if any, unless the bylaws or the board of directors provides otherwise; or (iii) any other officer, if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors. An officer’s removal does not affect such officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

Any person who has resigned as an officer of a corporation, or whose name is of record in the office of the clerk of the Commission as an officer of a corporation, may file a statement to that effect with the Commission.

Upon the resignation or removal of an officer, the corporation may file an amended annual report with the Commission indicating the resignation or removal of the officer and the successor in office, if any.

As used in this section “appointing officer” means the officer, including any successor to that officer, who, in accordance with subsection B of §

13.1-693

, appointed the officer who is resigning or being removed.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-46; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1990, c. 282; 1991, cc. 124, 146; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, substituted “time” for “date” three times, substituted “time” for “date and” once, and deleted “accepts the future effective date, it” preceding “may fill the pending vacancy” in the second sentence; and added “if any” to the end of subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “subdivision A 9” for “subdivision 9” in the second sentence of subsection A.